Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 8.
Premarital Agreement Act.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 4A M.J. Contracts,
§
119; 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,

§

50; 8B M.J. Frauds, Statute of,

§

19; 9B M.J. Husband and Wife,

§

75; 12B M.J. Marriage Contracts and Settlements,

§§

2, 3, 5, 6, 11, 13; 20 M.J. Wills,

§

45.

§ 20-147. Application.

This chapter shall apply to any premarital agreement executed on or after July 1, 1986.

(1985, c. 434; 1986, c. 201.)

Cross references.

- As to agreements between married persons, see
§
20-155.

As to waiver of homestead or family allowance, see
§
64.2-314.

Uniform law cross references.

- For other signatory state provisions, see:

Arizona: A.R.S.
§§
25-201 to 25-205.

Arkansas: A.C.A.

§§

9-11 -401 to 9-11-412.

California: Cal. Fam. Code
§§
1600 to 1617.

Connecticut: Conn. Gen. Stat.
§§
46b-36a to 46b-36j.

Delaware: 13 Del. C.
§§
321 to 328.

District of Columbia: D.C. Code
§§
46-501 to 46-510.

Florida: Fla. Stat.
§
61.079.

Hawaii: H.R.S.
§§
572D-1 to 572D-11.

Idaho: Idaho Code
§§
32-921 to 32-929.

Illinois: 750 I.L.C.S. 10/1 to 750 I.L.C.S. 10/11.

Indiana: Burns Ind. Code

§§

31-11-3-1 to 13-11-3-10.

Iowa: Iowa Code
§§
596.1 to 596.12.

Kansas: K.S.A.
§§
23-2401 to 23-2411.

Maine: 19A M.R.S.
§§
601 to 611.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno.
§§
40-2-601 to 40-2-610.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb.
§§
42-1001 and 42-1011.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann.
§§
123A.010 to 123A.100.

New Jersey: N.J. Stat.
§§
37:2-31 to 37:2-41.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann.
§§
40-3A-1 to 40-3A-10.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat.
§§
52B-1 to 52B-11.

North Dakota: N.D. Cent. Code

§§

14-03.1-01 to 14-03.1-09.

Oregon: O.R.S.
§§
108.700 to 108.740.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws
§§
15-17-1 to 15-17-11.

South Dakota: S.D. Codified Laws
§§
25-2-16 to 25-2-25.

Texas: Tex. Fam. Code
§§
4.001 to 4.011.

Utah: Utah Code Ann.
§§
30-8-1 to 30-8-9.

Editor's note.

- Acts 1985, c. 434, cls. 2 and 3, provide:

"2. That if any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, such holding shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the provisions or applications which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable. Nothing in this chapter shall affect in any way the validity of a pre-marital agreement executed prior to the effective date hereof.

"3. That this act shall not be effective unless reenacted prior to July 1, 1986."

Acts 1986, c. 201 reenacted
§§
20-147 through 20-154, effective July 1, 1986.

Law review.

- For 1985 survey of Virginia domestic relations law, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 731 (1985).

For article surveying developments in family law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (2002).

For 2002 survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts, and estates, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2002).

Research References.

- Harrison on Wills & Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2A The Elective Share.
§
2A.08 Loss of Elective Share by Waiver or Abandonment. Cox.

Lindey on Separation Agreements and Antenuptial Contracts (Matthew Bender). Parley and Lindey.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 14-101 Antenuptial Agreement, et seq.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 12B-Marriage Contracts and Settlement,
§
1.

§ 20-148. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

"Premarital agreement"
means an agreement between prospective spouses made in contemplation of marriage and to be effective upon marriage.

"Property"
means an interest, present or future, legal or equitable, vested or contingent, in real or personal property, including income and earnings.

(1985, c. 434; 1986, c. 201.)

Law review.

- For comment, "Enforcing Islamic Mahr Agreements: The American Judge's Interpretational Dilemma," see 18 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 1085 (2011).

§ 20-149. Formalities of premarital agreement.

A premarital agreement shall be in writing and signed by both parties. Such agreement shall be enforceable without consideration and shall become effective upon marriage.

(1985, c. 434; 1986, c. 201.)

Law review.

- For comment, "Enforcing Islamic Mahr Agreements: The American Judge's Interpretational Dilemma," see 18 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 1085 (2011).

§ 20-150. Content of agreement.

Parties to a premarital agreement may contract with respect to:

The rights and obligations of each of the parties in any of the property of either or both of them whenever and wherever acquired or located;

The right to buy, sell, use, transfer, exchange, abandon, lease, consume, expend, assign, create a security interest in, mortgage, encumber, dispose of, or otherwise manage and control property;

The disposition of property upon separation, marital dissolution, death, or the occurrence or nonoccurrence of any other event;

Spousal support;

The making of a will, trust, or other arrangement to carry out the provisions of the agreement;

The ownership rights in and disposition of the death benefit from a life insurance policy;

The choice of law governing the construction of the agreement; and

Any other matter, including their personal rights and obligations, not in violation of public policy or a statute imposing a criminal penalty.

(1985, c. 434; 1986, c. 201.)

Law review.

- For 1985 survey of Virginia domestic relations law, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 731 (1985).

For comment, "Enforcing Islamic Mahr Agreements: The American Judge's Interpretational Dilemma," see 18 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 1085 (2011).

§ 20-151. Enforcement; void marriage.

A premarital agreement is not enforceable if the person against whom enforcement is sought proves that:

That person did not execute the agreement voluntarily; or

The agreement was unconscionable when it was executed and, before execution of the agreement, that person (i) was not provided a fair and reasonable disclosure of the property or financial obligations of the other party; and (ii) did not voluntarily and expressly waive, in writing, any right to disclosure of the property or financial obligations of the other party beyond the disclosure provided.

Any issue of unconscionability of a premarital agreement shall be decided by the court as a matter of law. Recitations in the agreement shall create a prima facie presumption that they are factually correct.

If a marriage is determined to be void, an agreement that would otherwise have been a premarital agreement shall be enforceable only to the extent necessary to avoid an inequitable result.

(1985, c. 434; 1986, c. 201.)

Law review.

- For 1985 survey of Virginia domestic relations law, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 731 (1985).

For comment, "Enforcing Islamic Mahr Agreements: The American Judge's Interpretational Dilemma," see 18 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 1085 (2011).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (2011).

§ 20-152. Limitation of actions.

Any statute of limitations applicable to an action asserting a claim for relief under a premarital agreement is tolled during the marriage of the parties to the agreement. However, equitable defenses limiting the time for enforcement, including laches and estoppel, are available to either party.

(1985, c. 434; 1986, c. 201.)

§ 20-153. Amendment or revocation of agreement.

After marriage, a premarital agreement may be amended or revoked only by a written agreement signed by the parties. The amended agreement or the revocation is enforceable without consideration.

(1985, c. 434; 1986, c. 201.)

§ 20-154. Prior agreements.

All written agreements entered into prior to the enactment of this chapter between prospective spouses for the purpose affecting any of the subjects specified in § 20-150 shall be valid and enforceable if otherwise valid as contracts.

(1985, c. 434; 1986, c. 201.)

§ 20-155. Marital agreements.

Married persons may enter into agreements with each other for the purpose of settling the rights and obligations of either or both of them, to the same extent, with the same effect, and subject to the same conditions, as provided in §§ 20-147 through 20-154 for agreements between prospective spouses, except that such marital agreements shall become effective immediately upon their execution. If the terms of such agreement are (i) contained in a court order endorsed by counsel or the parties or (ii) recorded and transcribed by a court reporter and affirmed by the parties on the record personally, the agreement is not required to be in writing and is considered to be executed. A reconciliation of the parties after the signing of a separation or property settlement agreement shall abrogate such agreement unless otherwise expressly set forth in the agreement.

(1987, c. 41; 1998, c. 638; 2003, cc. 662, 669.)

The 2003 amendments.

- The 2003 amendments by cc. 662 and 669 are identical, and inserted the present third sentence, and deleted "However" at the beginning of the present fourth sentence.

Law review.

- For 1987 survey of Virginia domestic relations law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 745 (1987). For survey on domestic relations in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

For 1995 survey of wills, trusts, and estates, see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1175 (1995).

For article surveying developments in family law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (2002).

For survey article on the law pertaining to wills, trusts, and estates, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 267 (2003).